incubator/apertium-liv-fin/apertium-liv-fin.liv.lexc
LEXICON PRON_ĪKŠ !!= @CODE@ : 217
%<pron%>:	CASES	;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Proper noun inflection
!! ----------------------
!! Livonian proper nouns inflect in the same cases as regular
!! nouns, but with a colon (':') as separator.

LEXICON PROP_
%<tyä%>%<n%>%<prop%>:	K	;

LEXICON ACRONDELIMITER ! Here we need some kind of vowel harmony
    PROP_ ;
:%: PROP_ ;
:%- PROP_ ;
:%' PROP_ ;

!! !! Stem lexica
LEXICON PROP_PŪ !!= @CODE@ contains pū: 12
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_PŪ	;

LEXICON PROP_PŪ-SG !!= @CODE@ contains pū: 12
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_PŪ-SG	;

LEXICON PROP_RǬʼ !!= @CODE@ contains rǭʼ:rǭ 13
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_RǬʼ	;

LEXICON PROP_PǞ !!= @CODE@ contains pǟ:pǟ 14
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_PǞ	;

LEXICON PROP_TĪE !!= @CODE@ contains tīe:tīe 15
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_TĪE	;
	
LEXICON PROP_BRĪ !!= @CODE@ contains brī:brī 16
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_BRĪ	;
	
LEXICON PROP_TEI !!= @CODE@ contains tei:tei 17
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_KALĀ  !!= @CODE@ contains  kalā:kalā 18
%<n%>%<prop%>: NMN_KALĀ ;

LEXICON PROP_KALĀ-SG  !!= @CODE@ contains  kalā:kalā 18
%<n%>%<prop%>: NMN_KALĀ-SG ;

LEXICON PROP_TUBĀ !!= @CODE@ tubā:tubā 19
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_AIGĀ !!= @CODE@ aigā:aigā 20
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_LĒBA !!= @CODE@ lēba:lēba 21
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_PŪOGA !!= @CODE@ pūoga:pūoga 22
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_LǬJA !!= @CODE@ lǭja:lǭja 23
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_PǞVA !!= @CODE@ pǟva:pǟva 24
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_IZĀ !!= @CODE@ izā:izā 25
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_AŽĀ !!= @CODE@ ažā:ažā 26
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_ĀĻDŽA !!= @CODE@ āļdža:āļdža 27
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_SUKĀ !!= @CODE@ sukā:sukā 28
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_LIEPĀ !!= @CODE@ liepā:liepā 29
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_OKSĀ !!= @CODE@ oksā:oksā 30
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_VȰNTSA !!= @CODE@ vȱntsa:vȱntsa 31
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_LIESTĀ !!= @CODE@ liestā:liestā 32
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_ĀIGA !!= @CODE@ āiga:āiga 33
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_LĀNGA !!= @CODE@ lānga:lānga 33
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_SĪLMA !!= @CODE@ sīlma:sīlma 34
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_KǞNGA !!= @CODE@ kǟnga:kǟnga 35
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_ĀINA !!= @CODE@ āina:āina 36
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_VĒNA !!= @CODE@ vēna:vēna 37
%<n%>%<prop%>:	  NMN_VĒNA  ;

LEXICON PROP_RŌDA !!= @CODE@ rōda:rōda 38
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_RŌDA	;

LEXICON PROP_PADĀ !!= @CODE@ padā:padā 39
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_PADĀ	;

LEXICON PROP_SÕBRĀ !!= @CODE@ sõbrā:sõbrā 40
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_SÕBRĀ	;

LEXICON PROP_KÄPĀ !!= @CODE@ käpā:käpā 41
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_KÄPĀ	;

LEXICON PROP_MAKSĀ !!= @CODE@ maksā:maksā 42
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_MAKSĀ	;

LEXICON PROP_KĒRA !!= @CODE@ kēra:kēra 43
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_KĒRA	;

LEXICON PROP_JǬRA !!= @CODE@ jǭra:jǭra 44
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_JǬRA	;

LEXICON PROP_JǬRA-PL !!= @CODE@ jǭra:jǭra 44
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_JǬRA-PL	;

LEXICON PROP_PŪOLA !!= @CODE@ pūola:pūola 45
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_ĀITA !!= @CODE@ āita:āita 46
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_ŪŠKA !!= @CODE@ ūška:ūška 47
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_MȬKA !!= @CODE@ mȭka:mȭka 48
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_DADŽĀ !!= @CODE@ dadžā:dadžā 49
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_SUŠĀ !!= @CODE@ sušā:sušā 50
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_KUPŠĀ !!= @CODE@ kupšā:kupšā 51
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_TŠŪRTŠA !!= @CODE@ tšūrtša:tšūrtša 52
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_SĒMḐA !!= @CODE@ sēmḑa:sēmḑa 53
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_TĪERA !!= @CODE@ tīera:tīera 54
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_KRǬIPA !!= @CODE@ krǭipa:krǭipa 55
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_LILLA !!= @CODE@ kuțā:kuțā 57
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_KUȚĀ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_NĒTŠA !!= @CODE@ nētša:nētša 58
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
LEXICON PROP_KIV !!= @CODE@ kiʼv:kiv 59
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_KUOIG !!= @CODE@ kuoʼig:kuoig 60
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_KEP !!= @CODE@ kep:kep aʼb 61
        CASES   ;

LEXICON PROP_KRUȚK !!= @CODE@ : 62
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_KRÄMP !!= @CODE@ : 63
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_PIʼŅ !!= @CODE@ piʼņ:piņ 64
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_KUOȚ !!= @CODE@ : 65
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_VAKȚ !!= @CODE@ : 66
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_REŅ !!= @CODE@ : 67
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_OKŠ !!= @CODE@ : 68
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_KAŠ !!= @CODE@ : 69
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_DUŅTŠ !!= @CODE@ : 70
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

!!= @CODE@ : 71
LEXICON PROP_TORĪ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ vaʼg:vag 72
LEXICON PROP_VAʼG
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ kõʼl:kõl 73
LEXICON PROP_KÕʼL
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ suʼg:sug 74
LEXICON PROP_SUʼG
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ joʼug:joug 75
LEXICON PROP_JOʼUG
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_NIʼM !!= @CODE@ niʼm:niʼm 76
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_NIʼM	;

LEXICON PROP_NIʼM-PL !!= @CODE@ niʼm:niʼm 76
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_NIʼM-PL	;

LEXICON PROP_USK !!= @CODE@ : 77
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 78
LEXICON PROP_VAŠK
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_TUP !!= @CODE@ tup:tup 79
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_MAKS !!= @CODE@ : 80
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

!!= @CODE@ luʼm:lum 81
LEXICON PROP_LUʼM
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ mieʼr:mier 82
LEXICON PROP_MIEʼR
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ meʼr:mer 83
LEXICON PROP_MEʼR
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ muʼr:mur 84
LEXICON PROP_MUʼR
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ kuoʼd:kuod aig 85
LEXICON PROP_KUOʼD
        CASES   ;
!!= @CODE@ suʼž:suž 86
LEXICON PROP_SUʼŽ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ keʼž:kež aim 87
LEXICON PROP_KEʼŽ
        CASES   ;
!!= @CODE@ veʼž:vež 88
LEXICON PROP_VEʼŽ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ kuʼž:kuž 89
LEXICON PROP_KUʼŽ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 90
LEXICON PROP_RUZŪ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 91
LEXICON PROP_RADIO
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 92
LEXICON PROP_ANG
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 93
LEXICON PROP_KOUV
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 94
LEXICON PROP_KAND
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 95
LEXICON PROP_PȮRT
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 96
LEXICON PROP_NUŖM
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 97
LEXICON PROP_LAINT
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 98
LEXICON PROP_LOUL
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 99
LEXICON PROP_UL
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 100
LEXICON PROP_PAN
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 101
LEXICON PROP_TÄM
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 102
LEXICON PROP_NIŖȚ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 103
LEXICON PROP_KUĻ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 104
LEXICON PROP_PAŅ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 105
LEXICON PROP_DAŅTŠ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 106
LEXICON PROP_KOUŠ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 107
LEXICON PROP_SPLEIŠ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 108
LEXICON PROP_VEIS
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 109
LEXICON PROP_PȮIS
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 110
LEXICON PROP_KIĻG
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 111
LEXICON PROP_VȮĻG
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ täuž: adres 112
LEXICON PROP_TÄUŽ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 113
LEXICON PROP_VAŖŽ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 114
LEXICON PROP_PIERZ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 115
LEXICON PROP_VÕRGÕ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 116
LEXICON PROP_JÕUGÕ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 117
LEXICON PROP_VȬIDAG
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 118
LEXICON PROP_SIELDÕ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_NǬʼGÕ !!= @CODE@ nǭʼgõ:nǭgõ 119
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_AŠŠÕ !!= @CODE@ : 120
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ drūʼošõ:drūošõ 121
LEXICON PROP_DRŪʼOŠÕ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_SOʼV !!= @CODE@ : 122
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_KǬJ !!= @CODE@ : 123
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON propernouns
Aḑā:Aḑā PROP_PADĀ   ; !""
Arābij:Arābij PROP_KǬJ   ; !""
Armēnij:Armēnij PROP_KǬJ   ; !""
Austrālij:Austrālij PROP_KǬJ   ; !""
Austrij:Austrij PROP_KǬJ   ; !""
Āzij:Āzij PROP_KǬJ   ; !""
Bažāsūo:Bažā#sūo PROP_PŪ   ; !""
Belgij:Belgij PROP_KǬJ   ; !""
Bosnij:Bosnij PROP_KǬJ   ; !""
Bulgārij:Bulgārij PROP_KǬJ   ; !""
Dēņmǭ:Dēņ#mǭ PROP_PŪ-SG   ; !""
Dēvit% jǭrad:Dēvit% jǭra PROP_JǬRA-PL   ; !""
Dīʼeviņjǭra:Dīʼeviņ#jǭra PROP_JǬRA   ; !""
Dēvit% jǭrad:Dēvit% jǭra PROP_JǬRA-PL   ; !""
Englišmǭ:Engliš#mǭ PROP_PŪ-SG   ; !""
Ēstimǭ:Ēsti#mǭ PROP_PŪ-SG   ; !""
Frantsij:Frantsij PROP_KǬJ   ; !""
Grēkõmǭ:Grēkõ#mǭ PROP_PŪ-SG   ; !""
Gruzīj:Gruzīj PROP_KǬJ   ; !""
Helsinki:Helsinki PROP_TORĪ   ; !""
Horvātij:Horvātij PROP_KǬJ   ; !""
Ikškilā:Ikš#kilā PROP_PADĀ   ; !""
Indij:Indij PROP_KǬJ   ; !""
Indij% okeān:Indij% okeān PROP_KǬJ   ; !""
Īra:Īra PROP_JǬRA   ; !""
Īra% joʼug:Īra% joʼug PROP_JOʼUG   ; !""
Īra% joʼug:Irāj% joʼug PROP_JOʼUG   ; !""
Irē:Irē PROP_KALĀ-SG   ; !""
Irē% joʼug:Irē% joʼug PROP_JOʼUG   ; !""
Īrõmǭ:Īrõ#mǭ PROP_PŪ-SG   ; !""
Itālij:Itālij PROP_KǬJ   ; !""
Jeimeʼr:Jei#meʼr PROP_MEʼR   ; !""
Joʼugštūrga:Joʼugšt#ūrga PROP_ŪŠKA   ; !""
Karnõdmäʼg:Karnõd#mäʼg PROP_NIʼM   ; !""
Kēņigtarā% ūrga:Kēņigtarā% ūrga PROP_ŪŠKA   ; !""
Kikkõnjoʼug:Kikkõn#joʼug PROP_JOʼUG   ; !""
Kikkõnmäʼg:Kikkõn#mäʼg PROP_NIʼM   ; !""
Kīlmaūrga:Kīlma#ūrga PROP_ŪŠKA   ; !""
Kīʼnõ:Kīʼnõ PROP_NǬʼGÕ   ; !""
Kīnõmǭ:Kīnõ#mǭ PROP_PŪ-SG   ; !""
Krīʼevmǭ:Krīʼev#mǭ PROP_PŪ-SG   ; !""
Kūolka:Kūolka PROP_ĀITA   ; !""
Kūolka% kõlā:Kūolka% kõlā PROP_PADĀ   ; !""
Kūolka% nanā:Kūolka% nanā PROP_KALĀ   ; !""
Kurāmǭ:Kurā#mǭ PROP_PŪ-SG   ; !""
Leišmǭ:Leiš#mǭ PROP_PŪ-SG   ; !""
Lețmǭ:Leț#mǭ PROP_PŪ-SG   ; !""
Līepõ:Līepõ PROP_SIELDÕ   ; !""
Līndõdradā:Līndõd#raʼdā PROP_PADĀ   ; !"XX"
Lūʼž% joʼug:Lūʼž% joʼug PROP_JOʼUG   ; !""
Mäʼgkilā:Mäʼg#kilā PROP_PADĀ   ; !""
Nabāl% jǭra:Nabāl% jǭra PROP_JǬRA   ; !""
Nabālūrga:Nabāl#ūrga PROP_ĀITA   ; !""
Norvēgij:Norvēgij PROP_KǬJ   ; !""
Nõʼvkilā:Nõʼv#kilā PROP_PADĀ   ; !""
Ōstūrga:Ōst#ūrga PROP_ĀITA   ; !""
Pațīkmǭ:Pațīk#mǭ PROP_PŪ-SG   ; !""
Päpmäʼg% joʼug:Päp#mäʼg% joʼug PROP_JOʼUG   ; !""
Pēmpõd:Pēmpõd PROP_KAND   ; !""
Pētõr% jǭrad:Pētõr% jǭrad PROP_JǬRA-PL   ; !""
Pitrõg% joʼug:Pitrõg% joʼug PROP_JOʼUG   ; !""
Pizā:Pizā PROP_PADĀ   ; !""
Pūʼojmeʼr:Pūʼoj#meʼr PROP_MEʼR   ; !""
Pūoļmǭ:Pūoļ#mǭ PROP_PŪ-SG   ; !""
Puʼzzõ:Puʼzzõ PROP_NǬʼGÕ   ; !""
Rabādsūo:Rabād#sūo PROP_PŪ   ; !""
Rīgõ:Rīgõ PROP_SIELDÕ   ; !""
Rīgõ% lop:Rīgõ% lop PROP_TUP   ; !""
Rīnda:Rīnda PROP_ĀITA   ; !""
Rumēnij:Rumēnij PROP_KǬJ   ; !""
Rūʼnõ:Rūʼnõ PROP_NǬʼGÕ   ; !""
Rūoj:Rūoj PROP_KǬJ   ; !""
Rūotšmǭ:Rūotš#mǭ PROP_PŪ-SG   ; !""
Saksāmǭ:Saksā#mǭ PROP_PŪ-SG   ; !""
Sasmagā:Sasmagā PROP_PADĀ   ; !""
Säskkilā:Säsk#kilā PROP_PADĀ   ; !""
Sibīrij:Sibīrij PROP_KǬJ   ; !""
Siprikšvigā:Siprikš#vigā PROP_TUBĀ   ; !""
Slovakij:Slovakij PROP_KǬJ   ; !""
Slovēnij:Slovēnij PROP_KǬJ   ; !""
Sǭrmǭ:Sǭr#mǭ PROP_PŪ-SG   ; !""
Stēņḑa:Stēņḑa PROP_ĀITA   ; !""
Sūomõmǭ:Sūomõ#mǭ PROP_PŪ   ; !""
Sūrmõtsād% joʼug:Sūr#mõtsād% joʼug PROP_JOʼUG   ; !""
Šlītõr% mäʼg:Šlītõr% mäʼg PROP_NIʼM   ; !""
Tālsa:Tālsa PROP_ĀITA   ; !""
Tartu:Tartu PROP_RADIO   ; !""
Tiabõrmäʼg:Tiabõr#mäʼg PROP_NIʼM   ; !""
Tirkmǭ:Tirk#mǭ PROP_PŪ-SG   ; !""
Tšehij:Tšehij PROP_KǬJ   ; !""
Tubāmägūd:Tubā#mäg PROP_NIʼM-PL   ; !""
Tukāmǭ:Tukā#mǭ PROP_PŪ-SG   ; !""
Ūdmȯizõ:Ūd#mȯizõ PROP_SIELDÕ   ; !""
Ušīūrga:Ušī#ūrga PROP_ĀITA   ; !""
Vāldakrīʼevmǭ:Vālda#krīʼev#mǭ PROP_PŪ-SG   ; !""
Vanārūotš% joʼug:Vanā#rūotš% joʼug PROP_JOʼUG   ; !""
Vǟnta:Vǟnta PROP_ĀITA   ; !""
Vǟnta:Vǟnta PROP_ĀITA   ; !""
Vēna:Vēna PROP_VĒNA   ; !""
Vidūmǭ:Vidū#mǭ PROP_PŪ-SG   ; !""
Žūokkilā:Žūok#kilā PROP_PADĀ   ; !""
Kaupo:Kaupo PROP_   ; !"Kaupo"
